Connecticut, session 2026, HB05297.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 27-100f of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) On and after July 1, 2013, the Commissioner of Veterans Affairs,
or the commissioner's designee, shall, within available appropriations,
publish a list of qualified veterans' charitable organizations. The
commissioner shall place any qualified veterans' charitable organization
on such list for a period of three years. Organizations may apply and
reapply to the commissioner for inclusion on [the list by submitting]
such list, and the commissioner shall annually solicit such applications
and reapplications from organizations that the commissioner deems
likely to qualify for such inclusion. Each organization so applying or
reapplying shall submit to the commissioner, in a form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner, information regarding such
LCO No. 1564 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5297
organization's status [to the commissioner, on a form prescribed by the
commissioner,] and any additional information the commissioner
deems necessary to determine whether such organization constitutes a
qualified veterans' charitable organization. A qualified veterans'
charitable organization is one which: (1) Holds itself out to be
established for any benevolent, educational, philanthropic, humane,
scientific, patriotic, social welfare or advocacy purpose relating to or on
behalf of veterans; and (2) has been either (A) a nonstock corporation,
organized under chapter 602, or any predecessor thereto, for three or
more years, or (B) a tax exempt organization under Section 501(c) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding
internal revenue code of the United States, as amended from time to
time, for three or more consecutive years. The list of qualified veterans'
charitable organizations, a link to each such organization's Internet web
site [,] and the qualifications for inclusion on such list, as set forth in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, shall be published on the
informational Internet web site established in this section and shall bear
a disclaimer as follows: "This list is prepared for the public solely for the
purpose of information. The state of Connecticut provides no warranty
about the content or accuracy of the content herein.".
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 27-100f(b)